Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.330

Protection of unknown tenant.

If the persons entitled to such estate, for life or years, be unknown, the court shall provide for the protection of their rights in the same manner, as far as may be, as if they were known and had appeared.

[Code 1881 s 584; 1877 p 122 s 589; 1869 p 139 s 538; RRS s 870.]